Washington statutes.
RCW 4.68.020

Contents of summons.

The summons, as provided in RCW 4.68.010, must describe the judgment, and require the person summoned to show cause why he or she should not be bound by it, and must be served in the same manner and returnable within the same time, as the original summons. It is not necessary to file a new complaint.

[ 2011 c 336 s 114; Code 1881 s 315; 1877 p 64 s 319; RRS s 437.]